Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1924XS (4) 91 jda/jh S.F. 181 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256J.1 Electronic resources 1 provided to students ââ requirements. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âEducational receiverâ means all of the following: 4 (1) A postsecondary school. 5 (2) A public library. 6 (3) A school. 7 (4) A state agency. 8 b. âElectronic resourceâ means digital database resources, 9 internet-based database resources, digital instructional 10 materials, digital instructional subscriptions, internet-based 11 instructional materials, and internet-based instructional 12 subscriptions. 13 c. âObscene materialâ means the same as defined in section 14 728.1. 15 d. âPostsecondary schoolâ means all of the following: 16 (1) A community college established under chapter 260C. 17 (2) An institution of higher education under the state board 18 of regents. 19 (3) An accredited private institution as defined in section 20 256.183. 21 e. âProviderâ means a person, vendor, or any other entity 22 that provides electronic resources, including free electronic 23 resources, to an educational receiver. 24 f. âPublic libraryâ means all of the following: 25 (1) A library established by city ordinance. 26 (2) A library district as provided in chapter 336. 27 g. âSchoolâ means all of the following: 28 (1) A school district organized pursuant to chapter 274. 29 (2) A nonpublic school as defined in section 280.2. 30 (3) A charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E. 31 (4) A charter school or innovation zone school established 32 pursuant to chapter 256F. 33 h. âState agencyâ means any executive, judicial, or 34 legislative department, commission, board, institution, 35 -1- LSB 1924XS (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 6 S.F. 181 division, bureau, office, agency, or other entity of state 1 government. 2 i. âVisual depiction of a minorâ means the same as defined 3 in section 728.12. 4 2. An educational receiver shall not offer an electronic 5 resource to a student enrolled in kindergarten through grade 6 twelve, including a free electronic resource, unless the 7 educational receiver has entered into a written agreement with 8 the provider related to the electronic resource that states 9 that the provider agrees that the electronic resource has 10 safety policies and technological protection measures that 11 satisfy all of the following requirements: 12 a. The safety policies and technological protection measures 13 prohibit a user of the electronic resource from sending, 14 receiving, viewing, uploading, or downloading materials that 15 constitute any of the following: 16 (1) Obscene materials. 17 (2) A visual depiction of a minor engaging in a prohibited 18 sexual act or the simulation of a prohibited sexual act. 19 b. The safety policies and technology protection measures 20 filter or block access to all of the following: 21 (1) Obscene materials. 22 (2) A visual depiction of a minor engaging in a prohibited 23 sexual act or the simulation of a prohibited sexual act. 24 c. The safety policies and technology protection measures 25 comply with the federal Childrenâs Internet Protection Act, 26 Pub. L. No. 106-554. 27 d. The safety policies and technology protection measures 28 comply with 18 U.S.C. Â§1460 â 1470. 29 e. The safety policies and technology protection measures 30 comply with 18 U.S.C. Â§2252B â 2252C. 31 3. a. (1) Within fourteen days after the execution of 32 the written agreement described in subsection 2, the provider 33 shall certify to the educational receiver that the electronic 34 resourceâs safety policies and technology protection measures 35 -2- LSB 1924XS (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 6 S.F. 181 satisfy all of the requirements described in subsection 2. 1 (2) If the provider fails to certify to the educational 2 receiver that the electronic resourceâs safety policies and 3 technology protection measures satisfy all of the requirements 4 described in subsection 2, such failure shall be deemed a 5 breach of the written agreement, and the educational receiver 6 shall immediately terminate the written agreement. 7 b. If, at any point fifteen or more days after the execution 8 of the written agreement described in subsection 2, the 9 electronic resourceâs safety policies and technology protection 10 measures do not satisfy any of the requirements described in 11 subsection 2, the educational receiver shall withhold any 12 payments due to the provider under the written agreement 13 until the provider certifies to the educational receiver that 14 the electronic resourceâs safety policies and technology 15 protection measures satisfy all of the requirements described 16 in subsection 2. 17 4. a. A provider that has entered into a written agreement 18 with an educational receiver related to an electronic resource 19 shall, annually on or before June 30, provide a report to the 20 educational receiver that describes any issues the contractor 21 experienced related to the ability of the electronic resourceâs 22 safety policies and technological protection measures to comply 23 with the requirements of subsection 2. 24 b. The educational receiver shall provide the department 25 of education with a copy of each report provided to the 26 educational receiver under paragraph âaâ . 27 5. If any person believes that an electronic resourceâs 28 safety policies and technology protection measures do not 29 satisfy any of the requirements described in subsection 2, 30 or that an educational receiver is not complying with the 31 requirements of this section, the person may notify the 32 attorney general of the potential violation. The attorney 33 general may bring a civil action for injunctive relief against 34 the educational receiver to require the educational receiver 35 -3- LSB 1924XS (4) 91 jda/jh 3/ 6 S.F. 181 to comply with the requirements of this section. If the 1 attorney general is the prevailing party, the court shall 2 award reasonable court costs and attorney fees to the attorney 3 general. 4 Sec. 2. Section 709.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraphs: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. âEducational receiverâ means the same 7 as defined in section 256J.1. 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00c. âElectronic resourceâ means the same 9 as defined in section 256J.1. 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0g. âProviderâ means the same as defined in 11 section 256J.1. 12 Sec. 3. Section 709.15, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsections: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. Sexual exploitation by an employee 15 of an educational receiver occurs when a court finds that the 16 employee offered an electronic resource to a student enrolled 17 in kindergarten through grade twelve when the educational 18 receiver had not entered into a written agreement with a 19 provider related to the electronic resource that satisfies the 20 requirements established in section 256J.1, subsection 2. 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. An employee of an education receiver 22 who commits sexual exploitation in violation of subsection 4A 23 commits an aggravated misdemeanor. In lieu of the sentence 24 provided for under section 903.1, subsection 2, the offender 25 may be required to attend a sexual abuser treatment program. 26 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 27 2026. 28